Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-536
Waterworks; water supply; pollution; power to prevent.

The jurisdiction of a city of the second class or village to prevent any pollution or injury to the stream or source of water for the supply of waterworks constructed under sections 17-530 to 17-532 shall extend fifteen miles beyond its corporate limits.

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XV, p. 178;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XV, p. 169;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XV, p. 298;

Laws 1893, c. 8, § 1, p. 135;

Laws 1903, c. 21, § 1, p. 251;

Laws 1905, c. 30, § 1, p. 258;

Laws 1907, c. 17, § 1, p. 128;

R.S.1913, § 5119;

Laws 1917, c. 103, § 1, p. 272;

Laws 1919, c. 48, § 1, p. 138;

Laws 1919, c. 52, § 1, p. 152;

Laws 1919, c. 46, § 2, p. 133;

C.S.1922, § 4292;

Laws 1925, c. 41, § 1, p. 159;

C.S.1929, § 17-441;

Laws 1935, c. 34, § 1, p. 143;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-441;

R.S.1943, § 17-536;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 162.

A city of the second class or village has the geographically limited extraterritorial jurisdiction to make and enforce rules in the management of its water supply for its waterworks and to adopt controls over a designated wellhead protection area for the purpose of protecting the public water supply system. Johnson v. Village of Polk, 319 Neb. 352, 23 N.W.3d 96 (2025).

A village is limited to taking only such property as is presently necessary for the purposes described in section 17-531. Engelhaupt v. Village of Butte, 248 Neb. 827, 539 N.W.2d 430 (1995).